ro-RO: Capacitatea de reutilizare a foliei: De unică folosință; Reutilizabil (utilizări multiple); Altele
lt-LT: Plėvelės pakartotinio naudojimo galimybė: Vienkartinio naudojimo; Daugkartinio naudojimo; Kita
it: Possibile riutilizzo della pellicola: Monouso (usa e getta); Riutilizzabile (multiuso); Altro
th: ความสามารถในการนำฟิล์มกลับมาใช้ใหม่: แบบใช้แล้วทิ้ง (ใช้ครั้งเดียว); แบบใช้ซ้ำ (ใช้ได้หลายครั้ง); อื่นๆ
nb: Gjenbrukbarhet av film: Engangsbruk; Gjenbrukbar (flerbruk); Annet
zh-CN: 薄膜可重复使用性: 一次性（单次使用）; 可重复使用（多次使用）; 其他
zh-TW: 膠膜重複使用性: 一次性 (單次使用); 可重複使用 (多次使用); 其他
pt-BR: Reutilização do filme: Descartável (uso único); Reutilizável (multiuso); Outro
fr: Type d’utilisation du film: Jetable (usage unique); Réutilisable (multi-usage); Autre
ru: Возможность повторного использования пленки: Одноразовые (для однократного использования); Многоразовые (для неоднократного использования); Другое
de: Wiederverwendbarkeit des Films: Einwegartikel (zum einmaligen Gebrauch); Wiederverwendbar (Mehrfachverwendung); Sonstiges
sl-SI: Ponovna uporabnost folije: Za enkratno uporabo; Ponovna uporaba (večkratna uporaba); Druga
fi: Kalvon uudelleenkäytettävyys: Kertakäyttöinen; Uudelleenkäytettävä; Muu
sv: Återanvändbarhet av film: Engångsbruk; Återanvändbar (fleranvändning); Övrigt
pl: Możliwość ponownego wykorzystania folii: Jednorazowa; Wielorazowa; Pozostałe
en: Film reusability: Disposable (single use); Reusable (multi-use); Other
vi: Khả năng tái sử dụng của màng: Dùng một lần; Có thể tái sử dụng (dùng nhiều lần); Khác
hu: Film újrafelhasználhatósága: Eldobható (egyszer használatos); Újrahasználható (többcélú); Egyéb
tr: Filmin yeniden kullanılabilirliği: Tek kullanımlık; Tekrar kullanılabilir (çok amaçlı); Diğer
ko: 필름 재사용 가능 여부: 일회용; 재사용 가능(다용도); 기타
hr-HR: Ponovna upotreba folije: Za jednokratnu upotrebu; Za višekratnu upotrebu; Ostalo
el: Δυνατότητα επανάχρησης μεμβράνης: Μίας χρήσης; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμο (πολλαπλής χρήσης); Άλλο
ja: フィルムの再利用性: 使い捨て（単回使用）; 再利用可能（複数回使用）; その他
pt-PT: Reutilização da película: Descartável (uso único); Reutilizável (multiusos); Outro
nl: Herbruikbaarheid van film: Wegwerpbaar (voor eenmalig gebruik); Herbruikbaar (meervoudig gebruik); Overig
da: Films genanvendelighed: Engangsbrug; Genanvendelig (multifunktionel); Andet
bg-BG: Възможност за многократна употреба на фолиото: За еднократна употреба (едно използване); За многократна употреба (няколко ползвания); Друго
cs: Znovupoužitelnost fólie: Jednorázová (na jedno použití); Opakovaně použitelná (na více použití); Jiné
es: Reutilización de la película: Desechable (de un solo uso); Reutilizable (multiusos); Otros
sk-SK: Opätovné použitie filmu: Jednorazový (na jedno použitie); Opakovane použiteľný (viacnásobné použitie); Iné